Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-2793
Claim for credit or refund; limitation.

(1) A claim for credit or refund of an overpayment of any income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 shall be filed by the taxpayer within three years from the time the return was filed or two years from the time the tax was paid, whichever of such periods expires later. If there was no return filed by the taxpayer, a claim for credit or refund of a refundable credit shall be filed by the taxpayer within three years after the due date of the return for the year in which the refundable credit was allowable. No credit or refund shall be allowed or made after the expiration of the period of limitation prescribed in this subsection for the filing of a claim for credit or refund unless a claim for credit or refund is filed by the taxpayer within such period.

(2) If a claim for credit or refund of an overpayment is filed by the taxpayer during the applicable three-year period prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, the amount of the credit or refund shall not exceed the portion of the tax paid or any refundable credit allowable within the three years immediately preceding the filing of the claim plus the period of any extension of time for filing the return if such return was filed prior to the end of the extension of time. If a claim for credit or refund of an overpayment is not filed within the three-year period prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, but is filed within the two-year period prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, the amount of the credit or refund shall not exceed the portion of the tax paid or any refundable credit allowable during the two years immediately preceding the filing of the claim. If no claim is filed, the credit or refund shall not exceed the amount which would be allowable under either of the preceding sentences, as the case may be, if a claim was filed on the date the credit or refund is allowed.

(3) If an agreement for an extension of the period for assessment of income taxes is made within the period prescribed in subsection (1) of this section for the filing of a claim for credit or refund, the period for filing claim for credit or for making credit or refund if no claim is filed shall not expire prior to six months after the expiration of the period within which an assessment may be made pursuant to the agreement or any extension thereof.

(4) If a taxpayer is required by subsection (1) of section 77-2775 to report a change or correction in federal adjusted gross income, taxable income, or tax liability reported on his or her federal income tax return, or to report a change or correction which is treated in the same manner as if it were an overpayment for federal income tax purposes, or to file an amended return with the Tax Commissioner, a claim for credit or refund of any resulting overpayment of tax shall be filed by the taxpayer within two years from the time the notice of such change or correction or such amended return was required to be filed with the Tax Commissioner. If the report or amended return is not filed within the sixty-day period specified in such subsection, interest on any resulting refund or credit shall cease to accrue after such sixtieth day. The amount of such credit or refund shall not exceed the amount of the reduction in tax attributable to such federal change, correction, or items amended on the taxpayer's amended federal income tax return. This subsection shall not affect the time within which or the amount for which a claim for credit or refund may be filed apart from this subsection.

(5)(a) If a taxpayer is required by subsection (2) of section 77-2775 to report a change or correction in the amount of income taxable or tax credit allowable in one or more states and such changes or corrections when reflected in the return filed under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as most recently amended would result in an overpayment of tax, a claim for credit or refund shall be filed by the taxpayer within the earlier of (i) two years from the time the notice of such change or correction or such amended return was required to be filed with the Tax Commissioner or (ii) ten years from the due date of the return.

(b) If the report or amended return is not filed within the sixty-day period specified in such subsection, interest on any resulting refund or credit shall cease to accrue after such sixtieth day. The amount of such credit or refund shall not exceed the lesser of (i) the reduction in tax attributable to the change or correction in the amount of income taxable or the credit allowable in such other state in the return filed under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 or (ii) the increase in tax actually paid to such other state or states.

(c) This subsection shall not affect the time within which or the amount for which a claim for credit or refund may be filed apart from this subsection. This subsection shall apply to changes or corrections which become final on or after May 1, 1993.

(6) If the claim for credit or refund relates to an overpayment attributable to a net operating loss carryback derived from or connected with Nebraska sources, the claim may be made under rules and regulations prescribed by the Tax Commissioner consistent, to the extent possible under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, with the laws of the United States.

(7) For purposes of this section and section 77-2795, a timely filed petition for redetermination shall be considered a claim for credit or refund filed on the date the notice of deficiency determination was mailed.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 93, p. 1614;

Laws 1985, LB 273, § 66;

Laws 1987, LB 773, § 26;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 70;

Laws 2008, LB914, § 14;

Laws 2014, LB851, § 13;

Laws 2016, LB776, § 5.

Though this section provides a procedure by which a taxpayer may obtain a refund of overpayment of income taxes, it is exclusive and does not provide for class actions. Boersma v. Karnes, 227 Neb. 329, 417 N.W.2d 341 (1988).

United States District Court had original jurisdiction of cases to enjoin collection of state tax on income earned by Indians on reservations notwithstanding availability of state remedy. Omaha Tribe of Indians v. Peters, 516 F.2d 133 (8th Cir. 1975).